Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2710
Holder of evidence of debt, defined.

Holder of evidence of debt means the person in actual possession of or otherwise entitled to enforce an evidence of debt, except that holder of evidence of debt does not include a person acting as a nominee solely for the purpose of holding the evidence of debt or deed of trust as an electronic registry without any authority to enforce the evidence of debt or deed of trust. The following persons are presumed to be the holder of evidence of debt:

(1) The person who is the obligee of and who is in possession of an original evidence of debt;

(2) The person in possession of an original evidence of debt together with the proper endorsement or assignment thereof to such person;

(3) The person in possession of a negotiable instrument evidencing a debt which has been duly negotiated to such person or to bearer or indorsed in blank; or

(4) The person in possession of an evidence of debt with authority, which may be granted by the original evidence of debt or deed of trust, to enforce the evidence of debt as an agent, a nominee, or a trustee or in a similar capacity for the obligee of the evidence of debt.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 10.